Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB64.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "veteran" in section 9601 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9601. Definitions.Subject to section 9602 (relating to regulations), the following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Veteran." [An individual who served in the United States <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 Armed Forces, including a reserve component or the National Guard, and who was discharged or released from service under conditions other than dishonorable.] Any of the following:(1) An individual who served on active duty in the United States Armed Forces, including the Reserve and National Guard, who was discharged or released from service under honorable conditions.(2) A reservist or member of the National Guard who completed an initial term of enlistment or qualifying period of service.(3) A reservist or member of the National Guard who was disabled in the line of duty during training.* * *Section 2. Chapter 96 of Title 51 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER DMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.9621. Definitions.9622. Veteran-owned business logotype.9623. Nonprofit membership association.§ 9621. Definitions.As used in this subchapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Nonprofit membership association." A nonprofit organization whose mission is to support veterans, reservists, National Guard members, their spouses and families."Veteran-owned business." A business owned or controlled by a veteran.20250SB0064PN0509 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9622. Veteran-owned business logotype.(a) Logotype.--The department shall develop and design an official Commonwealth logotype to be used by a veteran-owned business.(b) Application.--The department shall develop an application, criteria and affirmation upon which an eligible business may apply for a license to use the logotype under this section.(c) Eligibility.--A veteran-owned business shall be eligible to be issued a license to use the logotype if:(1) the business is registered with the Department of State; and(2) at least 51% of the ownership interest in the business is held by a veteran.(d) Verification of military service status.--(1) The department shall verify the military service status of each business owner seeking status as a veteran-owned business without additional verification, by confirming that the business:(i) Possesses a valid verification issued by the Department of General Services as a veteran business enterprise, including a veteran-owned small business enterprise or a service-disabled veteran-owned small business enterprise.(ii) Possesses a valid verification issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs through VETBIZ or its successor.(2) Nothing under this subsection shall prohibit the department from working with another State agency or an additional third-party entity to establish veteran-owned 20250SB0064PN0509 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business verification.(e) Notice.--Within 10 days of the creation of a logotype under this section and the establishment of the criteria necessary to use and display the logotype and the applications and instructions on how to complete and submit an application, the department shall post on a publicly accessible Internet website of the department a notice that:(1) The logotype under this section is available to an eligible business.(2) Includes the criteria necessary to receive a license to use and display the logotype and allows for access to the applications and instructions on how to complete and submit the applications.(f) Issuance.--The department shall issue a license to use and display the logotype to an applicant deemed eligible under subsection (c).(g) Penalty.--(1) An individual commits a misdemeanor of the third degree if the individual fraudulently holds the individual out to be a veteran for the purpose of obtaining a license or using a logotype under this subchapter.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the full amount of each fine collected for a violation of paragraph (1) shall be deposited into the Veterans' Trust Fund.(h) Report.--By March 31 of each year, the department shall prepare an annual report on the number of veteran-owned businesses issued a license to use the logotype and the annual applications and renewals of the license to use the logotype. A copy of the report shall be sent to the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the Veterans 20250SB0064PN0509 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.§ 9623. Nonprofit membership association.Except as provided under section 9622(d) (relating to veteran-owned business logotype), the department may contract with a nonprofit membership association to perform the duties and responsibilities under section 9622.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 1. CHAPTER 96 OF TITLE 51 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBCHAPTER TO READ:SUBCHAPTER DVETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS LOGOTYPESEC.9621. DEFINITIONS.9622. VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS LOGOTYPE.§ 9621. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS." A BUSINESS OWNED OR CONTROLLED BY A VETERAN. A BUSINESS IS CONTROLLED OR OWNED BY A VETERAN IF AT LEAST 51% OF THE OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE BUSINESS IS HELD BY A VETERAN.§ 9622. VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS LOGOTYPE.(A) LOGOTYPE.--(1) NO LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND DESIGN AN OFFICIAL VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS LOGOTYPE TO BE USED BY A VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS.(2) THE LOGOTYPE SHALL NOT INCLUDE ANY LANGUAGE THAT MAY 20250SB0064PN0509 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BE CONSTRUED AS AN ENDORSEMENT BY THE COMMONWEALTH AND SHALL ONLY INDICATE THAT THE BUSINESS IS A VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS.(B) APPLICATION.--NO LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AN APPLICATION FOR WHICH A VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS MAY APPLY TO USE THE LOGOTYPE UNDER SUBSECTION (A). THE APPLICATION SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(C) ELIGIBILITY.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP GUIDELINES WITH THE CRITERIA TO ESTABLISH VETERAN-OWNED STATUS OF BUSINESSES APPLYING FOR THE LOGOTYPE. THE CRITERIA SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(D) CONTRIBUTIONS.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROVIDE A SPACE ON THE APPLICATION WHERE AN APPLICANT MAY VOLUNTARILY MAKE A CONTRIBUTION OF ANY AMOUNT TO BE DEPOSITED INTO THE VETERANS' TRUST FUND.(E) PUBLIC NOTICE.--WITHIN 30 DAYS OF THE CREATION OF A LOGOTYPE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL POST ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE A NOTICE THAT:(1) THE LOGOTYPE UNDER THIS SECTION IS AVAILABLE FOR USE BY AN APPROVED VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS.(2) INCLUDES INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO COMPLETE AND SUBMIT AN APPLICATION.(F) NOTICE OF DECISION.--WITHIN 60 DAYS OF RECEIVING AN APPLICATION UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DECIDE AND NOTIFY THE APPLICANT OF WHETHER THE APPLICANT IS APPROVED TO USE AND DISPLAY THE LOGOTYPE.(G) PENALTY.--(1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY PRESCRIBED BY LAW, 20250SB0064PN0509 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AN INDIVIDUAL COMMITS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE IF THE INDIVIDUAL FRAUDULENTLY HOLDS THE INDIVIDUAL OUT TO BE A VETERAN FOR THE PURPOSE OF USING A LOGOTYPE UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER.(2) THE FULL AMOUNT OF EACH FINE COLLECTED FOR A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE VETERANS' TRUST FUND.(H) REPORT.--BY MARCH 31 OF EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PREPARE AN ANNUAL REPORT ON THE NUMBER OF VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESSES APPROVED TO USE THE LOGOTYPE AND THE NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS RECEIVED. A COPY OF THE REPORT SHALL BE SENT TO THE VETERANS AFFAIRS AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE VETERANS AFFAIRS AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.SECTION 2. THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS MAY ISSUE GUIDELINES TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE ADDITION OF 51 PA.C.S. CH. 96 SUBCH. D.SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250SB0064PN0509 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718